public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A erapienar arapienévimo/L terapienar
SFX A erapienar arapienévimoni/M terapienar
SFX A erapienar arapienévitu/O terapienar
SFX A erapienar arapienévomi/K terapienar
SFX A erapienar arapiénelo/S terapienar
SFX A erapienar arapiéneme/H terapienar
SFX A erapienar arapiénemi/K terapienar
SFX A erapienar arapiénitu/O terapienar
SFX A erapienar arapiénomi/K terapienar
SFX A erar arada/I [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arade/I [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aradi/I [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arado/I [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arando/E [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arante [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arar/E [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar araralo/S [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararami/K [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar araratu/O [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararave/RT [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arare [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar araremo/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar araren/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararense [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar araresi/P [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar araresiu/Q [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararion/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararionse [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararisen/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararisense [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararision/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararisionse [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararisié/P [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararisiéu/Q [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararison/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararisonse [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararié/P [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arariéu/Q [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararme/G [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar araron/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar araronse [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararà/JNR [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar araràe/R [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararè/J [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararèmi/K [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar araré/P [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararémoni/M [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararésimo/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararésimoni/M [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar araréu/Q [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar araría/JNR [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar araríami/K [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar araríatu/O [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar araríe/JR [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar araríelo/S [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar araríemi/K [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ararò/J [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar araròmi/K [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arase/I [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arasi [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arasta/I [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar araste/I [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arasti/I [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arasto/I [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arava/JPR [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aravau/Q [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arave/J [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aravi/NP [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aravo/J [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arede [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arege [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aremo [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aremo/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aren/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arendo/E [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arene [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arense [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areralo/S [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerami/K [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areratu/O [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerave/RT [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areremo/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areren/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerense [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areresi/P [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areresiu/Q [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerion/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerionse [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerisen/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerisense [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerision/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerisionse [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerisié/P [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerisiéu/Q [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerison/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerisonse [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerié/P [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areriéu/Q [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areron/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areronse [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerà/JNR [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areràe/R [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerè/J [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerèmi/K [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areré/P [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerémoni/M [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerésimo/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerésimoni/M [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areréu/Q [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arería/JNR [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areríami/K [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areríatu/O [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areríe/JR [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areríelo/S [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areríemi/K [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arerò/J [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areròmi/K [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arese/I [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aresi [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aresta/I [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areste/I [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aresti/I [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aresto/I [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areva/JPR [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arevau/Q [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar areve/J [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arevi/NP [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arevo/J [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arion/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arione [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arionse [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arisen/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arisene [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arisense [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arision/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arisione [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arisionse [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arisié/P [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arisiéde/P [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arisiége/P [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arison/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arisone [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arisonse [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ariven/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arivense [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arivion/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arivionse [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arivié/P [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ariviéu/Q [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arivon/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arivonse [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arié/P [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ariéde/P [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ariége/P [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar ariéu/Q [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aron/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arone [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aronse [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arà [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aràa/JPR [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aràami/K [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aràau/Q [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aràe/J [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aràelo/S [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aràemi/K [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arài/NP [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aràimo/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aràimoni/M [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aràitu/O [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aràndome/G [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aràndomene/G [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar arào/J [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aràomi/K [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aràrmene/G [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aràsimo [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aràvami/K [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aràvelo/S [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aràvemi/K [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aràvimo/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A erar aràvimoni/M [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
