public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.dic
aidar/A
aldir/A
dexalvear/A
dexanemar/A
àrder/A
armar/A
inasiar/A
inaŧidir/A
inaxear/A
xbadajar/A
baɉar/A
inbalar/A
inbalinar/A
rebaltar/A
abandonar/A
xbaporar/A
inbarboɉar/A
inbaronar/A
inbastardir/A
xbatimentar/A
bavar/A
bear/A
inbeletar/A
bertonar/A
xbevakiar/A
xbiankiđar/A
binar/A
biondiđar/A
bituar/A
dexbocar/A
soboɉir/A
inbokonar/A
bolsegar/A
xbonbardar/A
boraskar/A
xborsar/A
botonar/A
inbovolar/A
inbragesar/A
inbrankar/A
braŧolar/A
dexbriagar/A
inbrodar/A
dexbrokar/A
inbronkar/A
brusketar/A
rebufar/A
skonbusolar/A
inbuxarir/A
descapar/A
cavar/A
cèñer/A
céñer/A
incepar/A
cilar/A
cokolatar/A
predir/A
davañar/A
xdentar/A
deŧimar/A
diladiar/A
interdíxer/A
dolar/A
predomenar/A
redopiar/A
adosar/A
indreŧar/A
dedúxer/A
đaltronar/A
malđontar/A
đugar/A
rièser/A
adenpir/A
riesir/A
exaɉerar/A
exitar/A
rarefar/A
fadegar/A
falkar/A
sfamar/A
sfantar/A
fataliđar/A
favorir/A
kuantifegar/A
trafegar/A
ofénder/A
inferar/A
konfermar/A
fetonar/A
infiankar/A
fiaskeđar/A
fifar/A
refilar/A
rafinar/A
infiorar/A
infisir/A
subafitar/A
sfoderar/A
desfojar/A
fondar/A
trasforar/A
trasformar/A
forteđar/A
infóter/A
infrankar/A
fraskar/A
sfraŧar/A
sfregar/A
sfríđer/A
frondeđar/A
frustar/A
sfulminar/A
sfuregar/A
refuxir/A
ingalbanar/A
ingaluŧar/A
xgangerar/A
dexgarbelar/A
garofolir/A
gavasar/A
gindar/A
godegar/A
xgoñar/A
governar/A
gramolar/A
grandenar/A
ingrapejar/A
agravar/A
dexgređar/A
xgretolar/A
griñar/A
xgriŧolar/A
dexgrosar/A
inguar/A
xgualivar/A
guernar/A
dexgustar/A
idroxenar/A
industriar/A
ingoxar/A
inprexonar/A
insular/A
intrajar/A
isar/A
joŧar/A
inɉavetar/A
ɉestir/A
xɉoŧolar/A
skacir/A
inkaenaŧar/A
kalafatar/A
inkalkar/A
inkalotir/A
kalumar/A
inkanar/A
kànđer/A
kanpar/A
kantarar/A
kapir/A
rekapitar/A
deskapuɉar/A
inkaregar/A
skarnir/A
karpionar/A
inkartonar/A
kaskar/A
rekatar/A
inkatiɉar/A
prekaŧar/A
prekavar/A
skaveŧar/A
kietar/A
deskodegar/A
koɉonar/A
skokonar/A
inkolorir/A
komenŧar/A
inkomodar/A
skonéter/A
koniar/A
konpletar/A
kontaminar/A
skontrar/A
koñar/A
deskórer/A
inkoraɉir/A
skordar/A
korniđar/A
skorsiđar/A
kostumar/A
kovar/A
krear/A
rekréser/A
skrikolar/A
deskrosar/A
krostolinar/A
inkuadrar/A
kucar/A
kuèrđer/A
interkuirar/A
rekular/A
rekuñar/A
kurvar/A
deskúxer/A
xlangorir/A
laorar/A
lasar/A
inlaŧar/A
leamar/A
delegar/A
lesar/A
relevar/A
liberar/A
xligar/A
linbelar/A
listar/A
logar/A
lontanar/A
loxar/A
inlunar/A
stralúxer/A
amaestrar/A
xmaɉar/A
inmaltar/A
dimandar/A
amankar/A
manxar/A
maraveɉar/A
marendar/A
martoriđar/A
xmaselar/A
mastegar/A
maŧar/A
inmaxarar/A
destrameđar/A
melar/A
mendar/A
xmenuir/A
meritar/A
dexméter/A
prométer/A
inmielar/A
aministrar/A
misiar/A
xmogar/A
dexmolar/A
xmojar/A
sormontar/A
moraliđar/A
morbinar/A
morsegar/A
mostrar/A
permudarar/A
inmusar/A
nanir/A
denegar/A
niŧar/A
anuir/A
ñaolar/A
xñokolar/A
okupar/A
onorar/A
organeđar/A
ovatar/A
apagar/A
palernar/A
apanar/A
spapolar/A
despaređar/A
inparŧialiđar/A
pastrocar/A
inpaŧar/A
spekular/A
spelukar/A
penelar/A
speocar/A
perpetuar/A
despetenar/A
kontrapexar/A
konpiàxer/A
pincar/A
despirar/A
inpiŧar/A
poder/A
póner/A
ponarar/A
spontiñar/A
soportar/A
spotacar/A
intraprénder/A
inpriar/A
proviđar/A
inputar/A
dexradixar/A
ranɉar/A
rastelar/A
regalar/A
rexegar/A
riŧolar/A
roeđar/A
ronkiđar/A
dexroveɉar/A
rumegar/A
saganar/A
salasar/A
desanguar/A
strasaver/A
insear/A
seguir/A
aseɉar/A
insenpiar/A
deseparar/A
setar/A
presidiar/A
sisolar/A
skandaliđar/A
skatar/A
skiumar/A
skriŧar/A
sofrir/A
solŧar/A
asòrber/A
sparar/A
sperar/A
spigaŧar/A
spojar/A
sputanar/A
starnir/A
istekar/A
stirpar/A
instokar/A
stranuar/A
istromentar/A
stufar/A
sudar/A
suplantar/A
destajar/A
tamixar/A
tarar/A
tastiđar/A
ténder/A
otenperar/A
ateñir/A
mantèñer/A
aterar/A
pretestar/A
tiraneɉar/A
intonar/A
torkiar/A
torxiar/A
trabaskar/A
trapar/A
travajar/A
trexendar/A
tronbar/A
tugar/A
ŧaratanar/A
inŧénder/A
desŧervelar/A
ŧimolar/A
inŧokir/A
inumidir/A
vadañar/A
xvangar/A
travaxar/A
veɉetar/A
xventar/A
resoveñir/A
soravèñer/A
inverniđar/A
envestir/A
vidimar/A
vitaliđar/A
xvodar/A
dexvoltar/A
voxar/A
xbarlar/A
konxeñar/A
xlainar/A
rexòlver/A
